Utah statutes.
53B-9-102.   Enrollment on space-available basis -- Enrollment reports.
(1)  Enrollment of senior citizens under this chapter is permissible after
regularly enrolled students have been assigned and admitted to available
classroom space in accordance with regular procedures and normal teaching
loads in that space within the approved budget.
(2)  Enrollments are determined by each institution under rules and guidelines
promulgated by the board in accordance with findings of fact that space is
available for the enrollments without increased instructional cost.
(3)  Institutional enrollment reports shall show senior citizens separately,
and they are not counted as full-time students.
